Utah statutes.
32B-2-606.   Delivery of liquor to package agency.

(1)  Liquor to be sold from a package agency may be transported from a warehouse or state store authorized by the department to the package agency if transported by a person authorized by the department to transport the liquor to the package agency, including a common carrier.

(2)  A person, while in or about a vehicle in which liquor is being transported, may not open, break, or allow to be opened or broken, a container containing liquor.

(3)  A person may not drink, use, or allow to be drunk or used, any liquor while the liquor is in transit under this section.

